Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this  2018 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) A  credit against the taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316
or, if  the taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318, is allowed to a taxpayer
for certified Opportunity Grant contributions made by the taxpayer during the tax year  to
the Opportunity Grant Fund established under section 4 of this 2018 Act.
(2)(a) The  Department of Revenue shall, in cooperation with the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, conduct an auction of tax credits under this section.  The department
may conduct the auction in the manner that it determines is best  suited to maximize the
return to the  state on the sale of tax credit certifications and shall announce a reserve bid
prior to conducting the auction. The reserve amount shall be  at least 95 percent of the total
amount of the tax credit. Moneys necessary to reimburse the department for the  actual
costs incurred by the department in administering an auction,  not to exceed 0.25 percent of
auction proceeds, are continuously  appropriated to the department. Moneys necessary to
reimburse the commission for the actual costs incurred by the commission in  administering
an auction, not to exceed 0.25 percent of auction proceeds, are  continuously appropriated to
the commission. The department shall deposit net receipts from  the auction required under
this section in the Opportunity Grant Fund.
(b) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the auction.
(3) Contributions made under this section shall be  deposited in the Opportunity Grant
Fund.
(4)(a) Upon receipt of a contribution, the commission shall,  except as provided in section
3 of this 2018 Act, issue to the taxpayer written certification of the amount certified for  tax
credit under this section to the extent the amount  certified for tax credit, when added to all
amounts previously certified for tax credit under this section, does  not exceed $14 million for
the fiscal year in which certification is made.
(b) The commission and  the department are not liable, and a refund of a contributed
amount need not be made, if a taxpayer that has  received tax credit certification is unable
to use all or a portion of the tax credit to offset the tax liability of the taxpayer.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1528 (SB 1528-B) Page 1
(5) To the extent the commission  does not certify contributed amounts as eligible for a
tax credit under  this section, the taxpayer may request a refund of the amount the taxpayer
contributed, and the commission shall refund that amount.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a tax  credit claimed under
this section may not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer and may  not be carried over to
another tax year.
(b) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section  that is not used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s  tax liability
for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused  in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax  year, and likewise, any
credit not used in that second  succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(c) A taxpayer is not eligible for a tax credit under this section if the first tax year  for
which the credit would otherwise be allowed begins on or after January 1, 2024.
(7) If a tax credit is claimed under this section by  a nonresident or part-year resident
taxpayer, the amount shall be allowed without proration under ORS 316.117.
(8) If the amount of contribution for which a tax credit  certification is made is allowed
as a deduction for federal tax  purposes, the amount of the contribution shall be added to
federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes.
SECTION 3. (1) In lieu of  the issuance of certifications for tax credit under section 2 of
this 2018 Act by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the  Legislative Assembly
may, no later than 30 days prior to the end of each fiscal year, appropriate to the commission
for deposit into the Opportunity Grant Fund  established under section 4 of this 2018 Act an
amount equal to the total amount that would  otherwise be certified for tax credits during
the upcoming fiscal year, based on the amount of contributions and accompanying applica-
tions for credit received by the commission during the fiscal year.
(2) If the Legislative Assembly makes the election  allowed in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion:
(a) Any contributions to the Opportunity Grant Fund made for  the upcoming fiscal year
and for which an application for  a credit under section 2 of this 2018 Act is pending shall,
at the request of the taxpayer, be refunded by the commission; and
(b) A credit under section 2 of this 2018 Act may not  be claimed for any contribution
made during the current fiscal year.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Opportunity Grant Fund is established in the State  Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Opportunity Grant Fund
shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Opportunity Grant Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission. After the payment of refunds to taxpayers as described  in sections 2 and
3 of this 2018 Act and payments to a tax credit marketer for  marketing services provided
by the marketer  as described in section 5 of this 2018 Act, the balance remaining in the fund
shall be used for the Oregon Opportunity Grant program under ORS 348.260.
(4) Expenditures from the fund are not subject to ORS 291.232 to 291.260.
SECTION 5.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  may hire or contract with
a marketer to market the tax credits described in section 2 of this 2018 Act to taxpayers.
SECTION 6. Sections 2, 3 and 5 of this 2018 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2024.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1528 (SB 1528-B) Page 2
SECTION 7.  ORS 314.752 is amended to read:
314.752. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.740 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or  allowable to a
C corporation for  purposes of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed or  are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.734,  on
income of the shareholder  of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share  of business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section)  or recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in  the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata share  under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were  realized directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement  applicable for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be  allowed in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business tax  credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass  devices, fishways), ORS 315.141
(biomass production for biofuel), ORS 315.156  (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance),  ORS
315.208 (dependent care facilities), ORS  315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS 315.237 (employee
and dependent scholarships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts),  ORS 315.304 (pollution
control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions),  ORS 315.331 (energy
conservation projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS  315.341 (renewable energy re-
source equipment manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy conservation  facili-
ties), ORS 315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation partnership zones),
ORS 315.507 (electronic  commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development contributions), ORS
315.521 (university venture development funds), ORS 315.523 (employee  training programs), ORS
315.533 (low  income community jobs initiative), ORS 315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Ac-
count contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable housing),  ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise
zone facilities), ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture workforce  housing), ORS 317.152 (qualified re-
search expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified research expenses) and section 9, chapter
774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contributions) and section 2 of this  2018 Act
(Opportunity Grant Fund contributions) .
SECTION 8.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS  chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as possible  (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS  305.140 and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.141, 315.156, 315.176, 315.204,
315.208, 315.213, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523 and 315.533 and section
2 of this 2018 Act  (all only to the extent applicable to a corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 9.
Section 10 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 10. There shall be added to federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes the
amount allowable as a deduction under section 199A(a) of the Internal  Revenue Code for the
tax year.
SECTION 11. Section 10 of this 2018 Act applies to tax years beginning on or after Jan-
uary 1, 2018.
SECTION 12. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1528 (SB 1528-B) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 23, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1528 (SB 1528-B) Page 4